Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.260

Notice—Determination infraction committed.

Unless contested in accordance with this chapter, the notice of infraction represents a determination that the contractor to whom the notice was issued committed the infraction.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.